District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.09

Vacancy on board.

(a)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a vacancy on the board of directors shall be filled:

(1)

Within a reasonable time by majority vote of the remaining directors until the next annual members meeting or a special meeting of members called to fill the vacancy; and

(2)

For the unexpired term by members at the next annual members meeting or a special meeting of members called to fill the vacancy.

(b)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, if a vacating director was elected or appointed by a class of members or a district:

(1)

The new director shall be of that class or district; and

(2)

The selection of the director for the unexpired term shall be conducted in the same manner as would the selection for that position without a vacancy.

(c)

If a member appointed a vacating director, the organic rules may provide for that member to appoint a director to fill the vacancy.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09 and § 29-1008.04.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 809 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition